Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin FRIDLEY; BNSF NORTHTOWN YARD OVERPASS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $6,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the city of Fridley to predesign, design, and engineer the extension of 57th Avenue NE, including public utilities as necessary and a bridge and approach walls, across the BNSF Northtown Yard from Main Street NE (Anoka County State-Aid Highway 102) westward to East River Road (Anoka County State-Aid Highway 1) in Fridley. This appropriation is for a match to leverage federal money for this project of approximately $24,000,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $6,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end